Washington statutes.
RCW 9.04.060

False, misleading, deceptive advertising—Action to restrain and prevent.

The attorney general or the prosecuting attorneys of the several counties may bring an action in the superior court to restrain and prevent any person from violating any provision of RCW 9.04.050 through 9.04.080.

[ 1961 c 189 s 2.]